Arkansas, session 2025, SB552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-27-140(17), concerning the definition of
"principal office" used under the Arkansas Business Corporation Act of 1987,
is amended to read as follows:
(17)(A) "Principal office" means the office (in or out of this state)
so designated in the annual franchise tax report where the principal
executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located.
(B) If the domestic or foreign corporation does not have a
"principal office" as described under subdivision (17)(A) of this section,
the domestic or foreign corporation may designate the address of the domestic
or foreign corporation's registered agent as the principal office of the
domestic or foreign corporation.
(C) A domestic or foreign corporation listing the address
*ANS203*
03/20/2025 3:30:26 PM ANS203

SB552
of its registered agent under subdivision (17)(B) of this section shall
provide the Secretary of State with the physical address of a named officer
or director.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-38-102(16), concerning the definition of
"principal office" used under the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, is
amended to read as follows:
(16)(A) "Principal office" means the principal executive office
of a limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, whether
or not the office is located in this state.
(B) If the limited liability company or foreign limited
liability company does not have a "principal office" as described under
subdivision (16)(A) of this section, the limited liability company or foreign
limited liability company may designate the address of the limited liability
company or foreign limited liability company's registered agent as the
principal office of the limited liability company or foreign limited
liability company.
(C) A limited liability company or foreign limited
liability company listing the address of its registered agent under
subdivision (16)(B) of this section shall provide the Secretary of State with
the physical address of a named member or manager.















03/20/2025 3:30:26 PM ANS203